Washington statutes.
RCW 19.95.005

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that many Washingtonians are solicited by solar energy salespersons and solar energy contractors to purchase or lease a solar energy system. Salespeople and contractors are responsible for accurately representing the financing terms, total cost, and performance of the solar energy equipment to support the customer in making an informed decision about whether the installation is economically viable. If these terms are not communicated correctly, customers face financial hardship. The legislature declares that this is a matter of public interest. It is the intent of the legislature to establish rules of business practice for solar energy contractors and solar energy salespersons to promote honesty and fair dealing with homeowners, other property owners, and leaseholders.

[ 2024 c 349 s 1.]